Arkansas, session 2025, HB1707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208(c), concerning filing of reports of
contributions for candidates for school district, township, or municipal
office and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) Filing of Reports.
(1)(A) The reports required by this section shall be filed with
the county clerk in the county in which the election is held Secretary of
State under subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(B) Reports shall be filed on the appropriate forms
furnished by the Secretary of State.
*SSS144*
03/06/2025 2:35:56 PM SSS144

HB1707
(2)(A)(i) The Secretary of State shall establish a filing system
for reports filed under this section.
(ii) The reports shall be kept for eight (8) years
from the date of filing, catalogued by candidate in chronological order, and
made available for public inspection.
(iii) For eight (8) years after the reports are
filed under this section, the Secretary of State is the official custodian of
those records.
(B)(i) After the eight-year period, the Secretary of State
shall turn the reports over to the Arkansas State Archives for maintenance
and continued public inspection.
(ii) After the eight-year period, the Arkansas State
Archives is the official custodian of the records of the reports filed under
this section.
(C)(i) The campaign contribution and expenditure reports
filed with the Secretary of State under this section shall be filed in
electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State.
(ii) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve
the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of campaign
contribution and expenditure reports in electronic form under subdivision
(c)(2)(C)(i) of this section to ensure that all required information is
requested.
(iii) The official website of the Secretary of State
shall allow for searches of campaign contribution and expenditure report
information filed in electronic form under subdivision (c)(2)(C)(i) of this
section.
(iv) The electronic format used for the filing of
campaign contribution and expenditure reports on the official website of the
Secretary of State shall aggregate total campaign contributions by a
contributor to determine if they collectively reach the limitation for lawful
campaign contributions under this subchapter.
(v) The Secretary of State shall not accept paper
filings under this subdivision (c)(2).
(3) The Secretary of State shall furnish to the commission, no
later than thirty (30) days after each filing deadline under this section, a
report listing the:
03/06/2025 2:35:56 PM SSS144

HB1707
(A) Names of all candidates who have filed for office;
(B) Type of report filed by each candidate; and
(C) Date the report was received by the Secretary of
State.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209(c), concerning filing of reports of
contributions for candidates for county office and resulting from Initiated
Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Filing of Reports.
(1)(A) The reports required by this section shall be filed with
the county clerk in the county in which the election is held Secretary of
State under subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(B) Reports shall be filed on the appropriate forms
furnished by the Secretary of State.
(2)(A)(i) The Secretary of State shall establish a filing system
for reports filed under this section.
(ii) The reports shall be kept for eight (8) years
from the date of filing, catalogued by candidate in chronological order, and
made available for public inspection.
(iii) For eight (8) years after the reports are
filed under this section, the Secretary of State is the official custodian of
those records.
(B)(i) After the eight-year period, the Secretary of State
shall turn the reports over to the Arkansas State Archives for maintenance
and continued public inspection.
(ii) After the eight-year period, the Arkansas State
Archives is the official custodian of the records of the reports filed under
this section.
(C)(i) The campaign contribution and expenditure reports
filed with the Secretary of State under this section shall be filed in
electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State.
(ii) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve
the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of campaign
contribution and expenditure reports in electronic form under subdivision
(c)(2)(C)(i) of this section to ensure that all required information is
requested.
03/06/2025 2:35:56 PM SSS144

HB1707
(iii) The official website of the Secretary of State
shall allow for searches of campaign contribution and expenditure report
information filed in electronic form under subdivision (c)(2)(C)(i) of this
section.
(iv) The electronic format used for the filing of
campaign contribution and expenditure reports on the official website of the
Secretary of State shall aggregate total campaign contributions by a
contributor to determine if they collectively reach the limitation for lawful
campaign contributions under this subchapter.
(v) The Secretary of State shall not accept paper
filings under this subdivision (c)(2).
(3) The Secretary of State shall furnish to the commission, no
later than thirty (30) days after each filing deadline under this section, a
report listing the:
(A) Names of all candidates who have filed for office;
(B) Type of report filed by each candidate; and
(C) Date the report was received by the Secretary of
State.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that transparency in election
contributions impacts the public peace, health, and safety as it ensures that
elections are conducted fairly and properly; that this act increases access
to reports of contributions for candidates for school district, township,
municipal, and county offices; and that this act should become effective at
the earliest opportunity to preserve the public peace, health, and safety by
providing increased transparency in election contributions to ensure that
elections occur in a fair and appropriate manner. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
03/06/2025 2:35:56 PM SSS144

HB1707
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.



































03/06/2025 2:35:56 PM SSS144